Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 1

General Provisions

9-13-101. Authority to lend appropriated funds.

The state board of equalization, with the approval of the funding board, is hereby authorized to lend state funds appropriated and made available for that purpose to municipalities and counties of the state upon terms and conditions hereinafter prescribed.

Acts 1966 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-1301.

Cross-References. Authority of counties to receive and disburse grants, loans and funds from state and federal governments, §5-8-108.

Financially distressed municipalities, counties, utility districts and education agencies, title 9, ch. 13, part 3.

Local economic adjustment assistance, title 9, ch. 14.

9-13-102. Reduction of assessment of utility property as prerequisite for loan.

Such loans shall be made only to such municipalities or counties as can be shown to have incurred unanticipated losses of revenue necessitated or prompted by decrees or orders of competent courts reducing the assessments of railroad or public utility properties which are centrally assessed by the comptroller of the treasury and the state board of equalization.

Acts 1966 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 2; T.C.A., § 9-1302; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 95.

9-13-103. Application for loan.

Applications for such loans shall be made only in writing and through the chief executive officer of the county or municipality so applying upon the duly enacted resolution of the governing body of such county or municipality. The application shall be addressed to the state board of equalization and shall set forth such information as the board may by regulation require relative to the budget, revenues, obligations and governmental operations of such municipality or county.

Acts 1966 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 3; T.C.A., § 9-1303.

9-13-104. Determination of necessity for loan.

The state board of equalization shall consider the loan application and conduct such investigation of the fiscal condition of the applicant county or municipality as it may deem proper to determine the necessity for such financial assistance. To this end, the board is empowered to avail itself of the services of the comptroller of the treasury and the comptroller of the treasury's office. The board shall have the right to obtain any information pertinent to the subject matter from any department of the state government and any office or department or agency of the government of the applicant city or county. It shall specifically have the power to subpoena and require the testimony under oath of any officer or employee of the applicant, and to compel the production of any paper or record in the possession or custody of any such officer or employee.

Acts 1966 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 4; T.C.A., § 9-1304; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 96.

9-13-105. Certification to funding board.

If following its investigation and consideration of the application the board of equalization shall deem the applicant municipality or county to require such financial assistance, it shall certify such finding in writing to the funding board for its approval.

Acts 1966 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 5; T.C.A., § 9-1305.

9-13-106. Consideration by funding board — Manner of making loan — Repayment — Interest.

The funding board shall independently consider any application for loan assistance as herein provided, and, on the concurrence of two-thirds (2/3) of its membership, authorize the board of equalization to lend to a municipality or county an amount not to exceed eighty percent (80%) of the local revenues shown to be lost as a result of such circumstances. Such loans shall be made only upon notes executed by the chief executive officer of the municipality or county showing on their face the concurrence of three-fourths (¾) of the governing body of the municipality or county and evidencing an attested copy of the official minutes showing such concurrence.

The loans shall be repayable with interest at the rate of two percent (2%) in equal installments commencing two (2) years following the date of the note and extending not more than five (5) years from the day of the first payment.

Acts 1966 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 6; T.C.A., § 9-1306.

9-13-107. Default — Withholding state funds.

In the event of default in the payment of any installment upon any loan made pursuant to this part, the board of equalization shall give notice of such default to the commissioner of finance and administration and the state treasurer. The commissioner shall thereupon withhold any distribution to the municipality or county of any funds otherwise distributable to it under the terms of any statute of this state until any and all arrearages have been paid by the municipality or county.

Acts 1966 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 7; T.C.A., § 9-1307.